Utah statutes.
9-8-305.   Permit required to survey or excavate on state lands -- Public
Lands Policy Coordinating Office to issue permits and make rules -- Ownership
of collections and resources -- Revocation or suspension of permits --
Criminal penalties.
(1) (a)  Except as provided by Subsections (1)(d) and (3)(c), each principal
investigator who wishes to survey or excavate on any lands owned or controlled
by the state, its political subdivisions, or by the School and Institutional
Trust Lands Administration shall obtain a survey or excavation permit from the
Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office.
(b)  A principal investigator who holds a valid permit under this section may
allow other individuals to assist the principal investigator in a survey or
excavation if the principal investigator ensures that all the individuals
comply with the law, the rules, the permit, and the appropriate professional
standards.
(c)  A person, other than a principal investigator, may not survey or excavate
on any lands owned or controlled by the state, its political subdivisions, or
by the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration unless the person
works under the direction of a principal investigator who holds a valid
permit.
(d)  A permit obtained before July 1, 2006 shall continue until the permit
terminates on its own terms.
(2) (a)  To obtain a survey permit, a principal investigator shall:
(i)  submit a permit application on a form furnished by the Public Lands
Policy Coordinating Office;
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), possess a graduate degree in
anthropology, archaeology, or history;
(iii)  have one year of full-time professional experience or equivalent
specialized training in archaeological research, administration, or
management; and
(iv)  have one year of supervised field and analytical experience in Utah
prehistoric or historic archaeology.
(b)  In lieu of the graduate degree required by Subsection (2)(a)(ii), a
principal investigator may submit evidence of training and experience
equivalent to a graduate degree.
(c)  Unless the permit is revoked or suspended, a survey permit is valid for
the time period specified in the permit by the Public Lands Policy
Coordinating Office, which may not exceed three years.
(3) (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (3)(c), to obtain an excavation
permit, a principal investigator shall, in addition to complying with
Subsection (2)(a), submit:
(i)  a research design to the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office and the
Antiquities Section that:
(A)  states the questions to be addressed;
(B)  states the reasons for conducting the work;
(C)  defines the methods to be used;
(D)  describes the analysis to be performed;
(E)  outlines the expected results and the plan for reporting;
(F)  evaluates expected contributions of the proposed work to archaeological
or anthropological science; and
(G)  estimates the cost and the time of the work that the principal
investigator believes is necessary to provide the maximum amount of historic,
scientific, archaeological, anthropological, and educational information; and
(ii)  proof of permission from the landowner to enter the property for the
purposes of the permit.
(b)  An excavation permit is valid for the amount of time specified in the
permit, unless the permit is revoked according to Subsection (9).
(c)  The Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office may delegate to an agency the
authority to issue excavation permits if the agency:
(i)  requests the delegation; and
(ii)  employs or has a long-term contract with a principal investigator with a
valid survey permit.
(d)  The Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office shall conduct an independent
review of the delegation authorized by Subsection (3)(c) every three years and
may revoke the delegation at any time without cause.
(4)  The Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office shall:
(a)  grant a survey permit to a principal investigator who meets the
requirements of this section;
(b)  grant an excavation permit to a principal investigator after approving,
in consultation with the Antiquities Section, the research design for the
project; and
(c)  assemble a committee of qualified individuals to advise the Public Lands
Policy Coordinating Office in its duties under this section.
(5)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Public Lands Policy Coordinating
Office shall, after consulting with the Antiquities Section, make rules to:
(a)  establish survey methodology;
(b)  standardize report and data preparation and submission;
(c)  require other permit application information that the Public Lands Policy
Coordinating Office finds necessary, including proof of consultation with the
appropriate Native American tribe;
(d)  establish what training and experience is equivalent to a graduate
degree;
(e)  establish requirements for a person authorized by Subsection (1)(b) to
assist the principal investigator;
(f)  establish requirements for a principal investigator's employer, if
applicable; and
(g)  establish criteria that, if met, would allow the Public Lands Policy
Coordinating Office to reinstate a suspended permit.
(6)  Each principal investigator shall submit a summary report of the work for
each project to the Antiquities Section in a form prescribed by a rule
established under Subsection (5)(b), which shall include copies of all:
(a)  site forms;
(b)  data;
(c)  maps;
(d)  drawings;
(e)  photographs; and
(f)  descriptions of specimens.
(7) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (7)(c), a person may not remove from
Utah any specimen, site, or portion of any site from lands owned or controlled
by the state or its political subdivisions, other than school and
institutional trust lands, without permission from the Antiquities Section,
and prior consultation with the landowner and any other agencies managing
other interests in the land.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (7)(c), a person may not remove from
Utah any specimen, site, or portion of any site from school and institutional
trust lands without permission from the School and Institutional Trust Lands
Administration, granted after consultation with the Antiquities Section.
(c)  If a specimen, site, or portion of a site is placed in a repository or
curation facility, a person may remove it by following the procedures
established by the repository or curation facility.
(8) (a)  Collections recovered from school and institutional trust lands are
owned by the respective trust.
(b)  Collections recovered from lands owned or controlled by the state or its
subdivisions, other than school and institutional trust lands, are owned by
the state.
(c)  Within a reasonable time after the completion of fieldwork, each permit
holder shall deposit all collections at the museum, a curation facility, or a
repository.
(d)  The repository or curation facility for collections from lands owned or
controlled by the state or its subdivisions shall be designated according to
the rules made under the authority of Section 53B-17-603.
(9) (a)  Upon complaint by an agency, the Public Lands Policy Coordinating
Office shall investigate a principal investigator and the work conducted under
a permit.
(b)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office may
revoke or suspend a permit if the principal investigator fails to conduct a
survey or excavation according to law, the rules enacted by the Public Lands
Policy Coordinating Office, or permit provisions.
(10) (a)  Any person violating this section is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
(b)  A person convicted of violating this section, or found to have violated
the rules authorized by this section, shall, in addition to any other
penalties imposed, forfeit all archaeological resources discovered by or
through the person's efforts to the state or the respective trust.
(11)  The division may enter into memoranda of agreement to issue project
numbers or to retain other data for federal lands or Native American lands
within the state.
